apertium-tat.tat.lexc
LEXICON POSTADV

%<postadv%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON KI

%<attr%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<subst%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON ADV

%<adv%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI

ADV ;
%<adv%>: KI ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI-BIRE

ADV ;
%<adv%>%<attr%>:дәге CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON ADV-ITG

%<adv%>%<itg%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON CC

%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON CS

%<cnjsub%>: # ;

LEXICON CA

%<cnjadv%>: CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

LEXICON QST

%<qst%>: # ;

LEXICON MOD-ASS

%<mod_ass%>: # ;

LEXICON MOD-IND

%<mod_ind%>: # ;

LEXICON EMPH

%<emph%>: # ;

LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ;

LEXICON IDEO

%<ideo%>: # ;

LEXICON ABBR

%<abbr%>: # ;
%<abbr%>: CASE-NONOM ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


!======================!
 LEXICON ModalParticles
!======================!


! Question modal particles
! ========================

әллә:әллә QST ; ! "y/n question"
мы:%~мы QST ; ! "y/n question" ! Dir/RL
мы:мы QST ; ! "y/n question" ! Dir/LR
мы:ме QST ; ! "y/n question" ! Dir/LR
мыни:%~мыни QST ; ! "y/n question" ! Dir/RL
мыни:мыни QST ; ! "y/n question" ! Dir/LR
мыни:мени QST ; ! "y/n question" ! Dir/LR
микән:микән QST ; ! originated from "-мы икән"

! Assertive (emphasizing) modal particles
! =======================================

бит:бит MOD-ASS ;
ич:ич MOD-ASS ;
ласа:ласа MOD-ASS ;
ләбаса:ләбаса MOD-ASS ;
ләбаса:лабаса MOD-ASS ; ! Dir/LR
шул:шул MOD-ASS ;

! Indefinite modal particles
! ==========================

дыр:%~дыр MOD-IND ; ! "" ! Dir/RL
дыр:дыр MOD-IND ; ! "" ! Dir/LR
тыр:тыр MOD-IND ; ! "" ! Dir/LR

! 'Emphasizing'/politeness modal particles
! ========================================

әле:әле EMPH ; ! ""


!==============!
 LEXICON Copula
!==============!


COP-I ; ! ""


!===================!
 LEXICON Postadverbs
!===================!


гына:%~гына POSTADV ; ! "only" Dir/RL
гына:гына POSTADV ; ! "" Dir/LR
гына:генә POSTADV ; ! "" Dir/LR
гына:кына POSTADV ; ! "" Dir/LR
гына:кенә POSTADV ; ! "" Dir/LR

да:%~да POSTADV ; ! "1. even if" Dir/RL
да:да POSTADV ; ! "" Dir/LR
да:дә POSTADV ; ! "" Dir/LR
да:та POSTADV ; ! "" Dir/LR
да:тә POSTADV ; ! "" Dir/LR

ук:%~ук POSTADV ; ! "же, даже" Dir/RL
ук:ук POSTADV ; ! "" Dir/LR
ук:үк POSTADV ; ! "" Dir/LR


!================!
 LEXICON Pronouns
!================!


PRON-PERS ;

DemonstrativePronouns ;

InterrogativePronouns ;






! ^ансы/*ансы$^-/-<guio>$^монсы/*монсы$
! ^бәрабәренә/*бәрабәренә$
! ^беркайда/*беркайда$
! ^беркайсы/*беркайсы$
! ^беркая/*беркая$
! ^беркаян/*беркаян$
! ^берничек/*берничек$
! ^җыенысы/*җыенысы$
! ^кайберләре/*кайберләре$
! ^кайберсе/*кайберсе$
! ^кайдагы/*кайдагы$
! ^кайчангы/*кайчангы$
! ^кайчандагы/*кайчандагы$
! ^кайчаннан/*кайчаннан$
! ^күпмеләп/*күпмеләп$
! ^күпмешәр/*күпмешәр$
! ^күпмешәрләп/*күпмешәрләп$
! ^монсыз/*монсыз$
! ^моңар/*моңар$
! ^моңарга/*моңарга$
! ^нибарысы/*нибарысы$
! ^никадәре/*никадәре$
! ^ниндирәк/*ниндирәк$
! ^нихәтле/*нихәтле$
! ^ничаклы/*ничаклы$
! ^ничәшәр/*ничәшәр$
! ^ничәшәрләп/*ничәшәрләп$
! ^һәрни/*һәрни$






башка:башка PRON-IND ; ! "other"
бер% нәрсә:бер% нәрсә PRON-IND ; ! "something" Use/MT
берәр% нәрсә:берәр% нәрсә PRON-IND ; ! "something" Use/MT
берсе:берсе%{n%} PRON-IND ; ! "one of" FIXME check
кайбер:кайбер PRON-IND ; ! "some"
кайберәү:кайберәү PRON-IND ; ! "some"

барлык:барлык PRON-QNT-POSS ; ! ""
барчасы:барча PRON-QNT-POSS ; ! ""
бары:бары PRON-QNT-POSS ; ! ""
берәрсе:берәр%>с%{I%}%{n%} PRNNEG ; ! ""
берәү:берәү PRON-QNT ; ! ""
бөтенесе:бөтене PRON-QNT-POSS ; ! ""
һәммәсе:һәммә PRON-QNT-POSS ; ! ""
һәрбере:һәрбер%>%{I%}%{n%} PRON-QNT-POSS ; ! ""
һәрберсе:һәрбер%>с%{I%}%{n%} PRON-QNT-POSS ; ! ""
һәркайсы:һәркайсы PRON-QNT ; ! ""
һәркем:һәркем PRON-QNT ; ! ""
һәрнәрсә:һәрнәрсә PRON-QNT ; ! ""

беркем:беркем PRNNEG ; ! ""
бернәрсә:бернәрсә PRNNEG ; ! ""
берни:берни PRNNEG ; ! ""
һичберәү:һичберәү PRNNEG ; ! ""
һичбере:һичбер%>%{I%}%{n%} PRNNEG ; ! ""
һичберсе:һичбер%>с%{I%}%{n%} PRNNEG ; ! ""
һичкайсы:һичкайсы PRNNEG ; ! ""
һичкем:һичкем PRNNEG ; ! ""
һичнәрсә:һичнәрсә PRNNEG ; ! ""
һични:һични PRNNEG ; ! ""

бер%-бере:бер%-бер PRON-RECIP ; ! "each-other, one another"

үз:үз PRON-REF ; ! "self"


!===================!
 LEXICON Determiners
!===================!


бу:бу DET-DEM ; ! ""
әлеге:әлеге DET-DEM ; ! ""
әнә% теге:әнә% теге DET-DEM ; ! ""
менә% бу:менә% бу DET-DEM ; ! ""
теге:теге DET-DEM ; ! ""
ул:ул DET-DEM ; ! ""
шул:шул DET-DEM ; ! ""
шушы:шушы DET-DEM ; ! ""
ошбу:ошбу DET-DEM ; ! ""

бар:бар DET-QNT ; ! ""
барлык:барлык DET-QNT ; ! ""
барча:барча DET-QNT ; ! ""
берничә:берничә DET-QNT ; ! "some"
бер% рәт:бер% рәт DET-QNT ; ! "several" Use/MT
бөтен:бөтен DET-QNT ; ! ""
күпләгән:күпләгән DET-QNT ; ! ""
һәммә:һәммә DET-QNT ; ! ""
һәрбер:һәрбер DET-QNT ; ! ""
һәртөрле:һәртөрле DET-QNT ; ! ""
һәр:һәр DET-QNT ; ! ""

унлаган:унлаган DET-QNT ; ! ""
дистәләгән:дистәләгән DET-QNT ; ! ""
йөзләгән:йөзләгән DET-QNT ; ! ""
меңләгән:меңләгән DET-QNT ; ! ""
ун% меңләгән:ун% меңләгән DET-QNT ; ! "" Use/MT
миллионлаган:миллионлаган DET-QNT ; ! ""
миллиардлаган:миллиардлаган DET-QNT ; ! ""

бер:бер DET-IND ; ! ""
берәр:берәр DET-IND ; ! "some"
әллә% кай:әллә% кай DET-IND ; ! "" Use/MT
кайбер:кайбер DET-IND ; ! "some"
кайсыбер:кайсыбер DET-IND ; ! "some"
әллә% ничә:әллә% ничә DET-IND ; ! ""

кай:кай DET-ITG ; ! "which"
кайсы:кайсы DET-ITG ; ! "which"
күпме:күпме DET-ITG ; ! ""

бернинди:бернинди DET-NEG ; ! ""
һичбер:һичбер DET-NEG ; ! ""
һичнинди:һичнинди DET-NEG ; ! ""

үз:үз DET-REF ; ! "oneself's"


!===================!
 LEXICON Punctuation
!===================!

! TODO: ^ > <
! TODO: / -> ^///<sent>$
,%<cm%>:, # ;
.%<sent%>:. # ;
..%<sent%>:.. # ;
...%<sent%>:... # ;
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%!%<sent%>:%! # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ;
%-%<guio%>:%- # ;
%—%<guio%>:%— # ;
%–%<guio%>:%– # ;
%‐%<guio%>:%‐ # ;
%﹣%<guio%>:%﹣ # ;
%－%<guio%>:%－ # ;
%֊%<guio%>:%֊ # ;
%‑%<guio%>:%‑ # ;
%‒%<guio%>:%‒ # ;
%−%<guio%>:%− # ;
%―%<guio%>:%― # ;
%'%<apos%>:%' # ;
%"%<quot%>:%" # ;
%«%<lquot%>:%« # ;
%»%<rquot%>:%» # ;
%“%<lquot%>:%“ # ;
%”%<rquot%>:%” # ;
%„%<lquot%>:%„ # ;
%‟%<lquot%>:%‟ # ;
%(%<lpar%>:%( # ;
%)%<rpar%>:%) # ;
%[%<lpar%>:%[ # ;
%]%<rpar%>:%] # ;
%{%<lpar%>:%{ # ;
%}%<rpar%>:%} # ;
%\%<sent%>:%\ # ;
%/%<sent%>:%/ # ;
%*%<asterisk%>:%* # ; ! TODO: Doesn't work: ^*/*$
%@%<at%>:%@ # ;
%~%<tilde%>:%~ # ; ! TODO: Doesn't work: ~
%_%<lline%>:%_ # ;
%€%<euro%>:%€ # ;
%$%<dollar%>:%$ # ;
%£%<pound%>:%£ # ;
%¥%<yen%>:%¥ # ;
%§%<section%>:%§ # ;
%©%<copyright%>:%© # ;
%®%<registered%>:%® # ;
%¶%<pilcrow%>:%¶ # ;
%¿%<invquest%>:%¿ # ;
%×%<division%>:%× # ;
%÷%<division%>:%÷ # ;
%%%<percent%>:%% # ;
%|%<vline%>:%| # ;

! TODO: * (asterisk) doesn't work here: ^*/*$
! TODO: Do we need № here or above with a separate tag?
<( %* | %# | %№ | %+ | • | %& | = )+> PUNCT ; ! Use/MT

LEXICON PUNCT

%<punct%>: # ;

!==============!
 LEXICON Digits ! Use/Circ
!==============!


%0:%0 NUM ;  ! Use/Circ
№:№ DIGITLEX ;  ! Use/Circ
DIGITLEX ; ! Use/Circ
LASTDIGIT ; ! Use/Circ
LASTDIGIT-REST ; ! Use/Circ

LEXICON NP-UNK

%<np%>%<unk%>: # ;

LEXICON GUESS-QUEUE

<(a | b | c | d | e | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | o | p | q | r | s | t | u | v | w | x | y | z)+> NP-UNK ;

 LEXICON Conjunctions
вә:вә CC ; ! "and (archaic)"
вә:вәә CC ; ! "and (archaic)" Dir/LR
вә:вәс CC ; ! "and (archaic)" Dir/LR
вә:вәл CC ; ! "and (archaic)" Dir/LR
да:%~да CC ; ! "also" Dir/RL
да:да CC ; ! "" Dir/LR
да:та CC ; ! "" Dir/LR
да:дә CC ; ! "" Dir/LR
ни:ни CC ; ! "neither... , nor ... (x2)"
плүс:плюс CC ; ! "" Dir/LR
шулай% ук:шулай% ук CC ; ! "likewise"
бары% тик:бары% тик CC ; ! "but,just"
вәләкин:вәләкин CC ; ! ""
мәгәр:мәгәр CC ; ! "but,just"
фәкать:фәкать CC ; ! "но, только"
ә:ә CC ; ! "contrastive and"
я:я CC ; ! "or"
яки:яки CC ; ! "or"
әле:әле CC ; ! "то ... , то ... (х2) "
гүя:гүя CS ; ! "as if"
гүяки:гүяки CS ; ! "as if"
гәрчә:гәрчә CS ; ! "even if"
ки:ки CS ; ! "that, in order that"
чөнки:чөнки CS ; ! "because"
югыйсә:югыйсә CS ; ! ""
юкса:юкса CS ; ! ""
ягъни:ягъни CS ; ! "that is, то есть"
әгәр% дә:әгәр% дә CS ; ! "if" Use/MT
әгәр:әгәр CS ; ! "if"
алайса:алайса CA ; ! ""
аның% каравы:аның% каравы CA ; ! "nevertheless"
әйтүләренчә:әйтүләренчә CA ; ! ""
башкача% әйткәндә:башкача% әйткәндә CA ; ! ""
белдерүенчә:белдерүенчә CA ; ! ""
әйтүенчә:әйтүенчә CA ; ! ""
мәгълүматынча:мәгълүматынча CA ; ! ""
сүзенчә:сүзенчә CA ; ! ""
сүзләренчә:сүзләренчә CA ; ! ""
уенча:уенча CA ; ! ""
уйлавынча:уйлавынча CA ; ! ""
фикеренчә:фикеренчә CA ; ! ""
хәбәр% итүенчә:хәбәр% итүенчә CA ; ! ""
шулай% да:шулай% да CA ; ! "nevertheless"
шул% сәбәпле:шул% сәбәпле CA ; ! "therefore"
шунлыктан:шунлыктан CA ; ! "that is why"
шуңа% күрә:шуңа% күрә CA ; ! "therefore"
язуынча:язуынча CA ; ! ""
 LEXICON Nouns
тәкмил:тәкмил ADV ; ! "" Use/MT
хәзер:хазер ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "" Dir/LR err_orth
шәрган:шәрган ADV ; ! "" Use/MT
 LEXICON Adverbs
кайда:кайда ADV-ITG ; ! ""
кайдан:кайдан ADV-ITG ; ! ""
каян:каян ADV-ITG ; ! ""
кайчан:кайчан ADV-ITG ; ! ""
кая:кая ADV-ITG ; ! ""
ник:ник ADV-ITG ; ! ""
никадәрле:никадәрле ADV-ITG ; ! ""
никадәр:никадәр ADV-ITG ; ! ""
ник% алай:ник% алай ADV ; ! "" Use/MT
ни% өчен:ни% өчен ADV-ITG ; ! "why,what for" Use/MT
ничек:ничек ADV-ITG ; ! "how"
кайчандыр:кайчандыр ADV ; ! "некогда, когда-то" ! Use/MT
алга% таба:алга% таба ADV ; ! "" Use/MT
ахыргача:ахыргача ADV ; ! ""
бераз:бераз ADV ; ! "a little"
берәм%-берәм:берәм%-берәм ADV ; ! ""
бертавыштан:бертавыштан ADV ; ! "unanimously"
бире:бире ADV ; ! "nearside"
вакытлыча:вакытлыча ADV ; ! ""
дәррәү:дәррәү ADV ; ! ""
әнә:әнә  ADV ; ! ""
исәпләвенчә:исәпләвенчә ADV ; ! ""
күптәннән:күптәннән ADV ; ! ""
сөйләвенчә:сөйләвенчә ADV ; ! ""
хайваннарча:хайваннарча ADV ; ! ""
шактый:шактый ADV ; ! ""
янәдән:янәдән ADV ; ! "again"
башта:башта ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "at first"
бая:бая ADV-WITH-KI ; ! ""
бире:бире ADV-WITH-KI-BIRE ; ! "" FIXME CHECK
борын:борын ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "earlier"
бүген:бүген ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "today"
быел:быел ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "this year"
былтыр:былтыр ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "last year"
әле:әле ADV-WITH-KI ; ! ""
әүвәл:әүвәл ADV-WITH-KI ; ! ""
иртән:иртән ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "morning"
кичә:кичә ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "yesterday"
кич:кич ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "in evening"
көндез:көндез ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "during the day"
соң:соң ADV-WITH-KI ; ! ""
хәзер:хәзер ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "contrastive now"
элек:элек ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "earlier"
 LEXICON Interjections
алло:алло INTERJ ; ! ""
ах:ах INTERJ ; ! ""
ах%-ух:ах%-ух INTERJ ; ! ""
бәс:бәс INTERJ ; ! ""
булды:булды INTERJ ; ! ""
вәссәлам:вәссәлам INTERJ ; ! ""
әйдәгез:әйдәгез INTERJ ; ! ""
әйе:әйе INTERJ ; ! ""
әх:әх INTERJ ; ! ""
их:их INTERJ ; ! ""
машалла:машалла INTERJ ; ! ""
ну:ну INTERJ ; ! ""
прес:прес INTERJ ; ! ""
үчтеки:үчтеки INTERJ ; ! ""
чү%-чү:чү%-чү INTERJ ; ! ""
ярый:ярый INTERJ ; ! ""
берүк:берүк INTERJ ; ! ""
мәсәлән:мәсәлән INTERJ ; ! "e.g."
 LEXICON Ideophones
гыж%-гыж:гыж%-гыж IDEO ; ! ""
дер%-дер:дер%-дер IDEO ; ! ""
дөбер:дөбер IDEO ; ! ""
зыңгыр%-зыңгыр:зыңгыр%-зыңгыр IDEO ; ! ""
кылтырт:кылтырт IDEO ; ! ""
лас%-лос:лас%-лос IDEO ; ! ""
лыштыр:лыштыр IDEO ; ! ""
мыңгыр%-мыңгыр:мыңгыр%-мыңгыр IDEO ; ! ""
пыр%-пыр:пыр%-пыр IDEO ; ! ""
тап%-топ:тап%-топ IDEO ; ! ""
тупыр%-тупыр:тупыр%-тупыр IDEO ; ! ""
тәч%-тәч:тәч%-тәч IDEO ; ! ""
чарт%-чорт:чарт%-чорт IDEO ; ! ""
чоңгылт:чоңгылт IDEO ; ! ""
чыши%-пыши:чыши%-пыши IDEO ; ! ""
шалт:шалт IDEO ; ! ""
шаңгыр:шаңгыр IDEO ; ! ""
шыш%-пыш:шыш%-пыш IDEO ; ! ""
 LEXICON Abbreviations
EITI:EITI ABBR ; ! ""
Kaz:Kaz ABBR ; ! ""
АО:АО  ABBR ; ! ""
Биохим:Биохим ABBR ; ! "Разведка&Добыча"
ВАЗ:ВАЗ ABBR ; ! ""
ДТК:ДТК ABBR ; ! ""
ЗАГС:ЗАГС ABBR ; ! ""
КВН:КВН ABBR ; ! ""
км³:км³ ABBR ;  ! "km³"
КХДР:КХДР ABBR ; ! ""
МВт:МВт ABBR ; ! ""
м:м ABBR ; ! "m"
НАСА:НАСА ABBR ; ! ""
Өзәнмунайгаз:Өзәнмунайгаз ABBR ; ! ""
СНПС:СНПС ABBR ; ! ""
СЭС:СЭС ABBR ; ! ""
т%.:т%. ABBR ; ! "tonne"
ФЭК:ФЭК ABBR ; ! ""
ЮНЕСКО:ЮНЕСКО ABBR ; ! ""
